Arkansas, session 2025, SB524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-66-103(a), concerning the offense of
keeping a gambling house, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person or entity commits the offense of keeping a gambling house
if the person or entity:
(1) Keeps, conducts, or operates, or who is interested directly
or indirectly in keeping, conducting, or operating any gambling house or
place, whether a physical location or online, where gambling is carried on;
(2) Sets up, keeps, or exhibits or causes to be set up, kept, or
*CRH297*
03/19/2025 3:25:05 PM CRH297

SB524
exhibited or assists in setting up, keeping, or exhibiting any gambling
device; or
(3) Is interested directly or indirectly in running any gambling
house or in setting up and exhibiting any gambling device, either by
furnishing money or another article, for the purpose of carrying on any
gambling house;
(4)(A) Makes available or participates in keeping, conducting,
or operating any game, contest, or promotion that is available on the
internet or accessible on a mobile phone, computer terminal, or similar
device capable of accessing the game, contest, or promotion that utilizes a
dual-currency system of payment that allows the player to exchange the
currency for a prize, award, cash, or cash equivalent, or a chance to win any
prize, award, cash, or cash equivalent, and simulates:
(i) Casino-style gaming, including without
limitation slot machines, video poker, or table games that include without
limitation blackjack, roulette, craps, and poker;
(ii) Lottery games, including without limitation
draw games, instant win games, keno, and bingo; and
(iii) Sports wagering.
(B) A sweepstakes game that does not award cash or a cash
equivalent is not included under subdivision (a)(4) of this section.
(C) Subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section does not apply
to a casino licensed by the Arkansas Racing Commission; or
(5)(A) Makes available or participates in keeping, conducting,
or operating any game online that the commission or the Department of Finance
and Administration, consistent with the Arkansas Constitution, may determine
by rule to be sports wagering.
(B) Subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this section does not apply
to a casino licensed by the commission.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 117, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 2 — Interactive Gaming Act

23-117-201. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Interactive
03/19/2025 3:25:05 PM CRH297

SB524
Gaming Act”.

23-117-202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Casino licensee" means any individual, corporation,
partnership, association, trust, or other entity holding a license issued
by the Arkansas Racing Commission to conduct casino gaming as authorized
by The Arkansas Casino Gaming Amendment of 2018, Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 100;
(2) "Dormant account” means an interactive gaming account that
has had no patron-initiated activity for a period of sixteen (16) months;
(3)(A) “Interactive gaming” includes the placing of wagers
through a server-based gaming system that is situated in the United States
using a computer network of interoperable packet switched data networks
through which a casino licensee may offer authorized interactive games to a
person who has established an interactive gaming account.
(B) "Interactive gaming" includes the placing of wagers
using:
(i) A mobile cellular device using an application;
or
(ii) An internet browser on a supported device using
software.
(C) "Interactive gaming" includes a name, image, or
likeness drawing game conducted through an electronic device or machine to
benefit a name, image, or likeness collective consistent with the Arkansas
Student-Athlete Publicity Rights Act, § 4-75-1301 et seq.;
(4)(A) “Interactive gaming system” means a gaming device.
(B) "Interactive gaming system" includes:
(i) The collective hardware, software,
communication, technology, and proprietary hardware and software specifically
designed or modified for and intended for use in the conduct of interactive
gaming; and
(ii) The core components of the interactive gaming
system, including without limitation the servers or databases running the
games on the interactive gaming system and storing game and interactive
gaming account information, that are hosted within the United States, with
03/19/2025 3:25:05 PM CRH297

SB524
the core components residing on physical hardware or a remote server,
provided that gaming participation is confined to the state; and
(5) "Name, image, or likeness drawing game" means a drawing game
of chance approved by the commission, the net proceeds of which after
incurred expenses, as approved by the commission, are divided between:
(A) A name, image, or likeness collective consistent with
the Arkansas Student-Athlete Publicity Rights Act, § 4-75-1301 et seq., or
any other organization affiliated with an Arkansas collegiate athletics
program; and
(B) The winning participant.

23-117-203. Interactive gaming.
(a)(1)(A) A casino licensee shall not operate an interactive gaming
system in this state unless the interactive gaming system has been approved
by the Arkansas Racing Commission.
(B) An activity conducted under Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 84, shall not be considered interactive gaming.
(2) An interactive gaming system operated by a casino licensee
is subject to rules promulgated by the commission.
(3) A casino licensee is limited to one (1) branded interactive
gaming system that is identified with the casino licensee.
(4) The operation of interactive gaming is prohibited in
circumstances in which a majority of the net casino gaming receipts, as
defined by The Arkansas Casino Gaming Amendment of 2018, Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 100, from interactive gaming is paid to a third-party
vendor assisting in the operation of the interactive gaming.
(b) An interactive gaming system shall meet applicable minimum
technical standards provided in Gaming Laboratories International's GLI-19:
Standards for Interactive Gaming Systems, as revised on July 17, 2020, or an
equivalent certification issued by a testing laboratory as approved and
licensed by the commission.
(c) A casino licensee may operate a name, image, or likeness drawing
game as approved by the commission.

23-117-204. Internal controls for casino licensees related to
interactive gaming.
03/19/2025 3:25:05 PM CRH297

SB524
(a) A casino licensee shall comply with:
(1) Standards related to interactive gaming adopted by the
Arkansas Racing Commission to implement this subchapter; and
(2) Existing rules of the commission.
(b) The commission shall:
(1) Approve game titles or themes; and
(2) Provide for standards and practices consistent with the
standards and practices of the Gaming Laboratories International, or other
testing entity licensed by the commission, approved in another jurisdiction
in the United States to serve as validation in Arkansas.
(c)(1) Live personnel engaged in dealing cards or similar activities
involved in interactive gaming shall hold a gaming license in the
jurisdiction in which the live personnel physically operate.
(2) A casino licensee shall transmit a list of the live
personnel described in subdivision (c)(1) of this section to the commission
no less than monthly.
(d) The commission may determine additional areas that require
internal controls that may necessitate the development of minimum standards.

23-117-205. Acceptance of wagers.
A casino licensee shall not accept or facilitate a wager on interactive
gaming other than as set forth by rule of the Arkansas Racing Commission.

23-117-206. Disposition of dormant accounts.
(a)(1) A casino licensee may suspend a dormant account.
(2) The casino licensee may reactivate a dormant account
suspended under subdivision (a)(1) of this section only after reverifying the
current government-issued picture identification of the account holder and
other information as required by the Arkansas Racing Commission.
(b) All amounts remaining inactive in the dormant account after a
period of two (2) years of the account's becoming a dormant account shall be
paid into a cash fund of the commission.
(c) Before closing a dormant account under this section, the casino
licensee shall attempt to contact the account holder a minimum of one (1)
time per year.

03/19/2025 3:25:05 PM CRH297

SB524
23-117-207. Prohibition — Penalty.
(a) The operation of an interactive gaming system without a casino
license in this state is prohibited.
(b) Consistent with § 5-66-103, a violation of subsection (a) of this
section is a Class D felony.

23-117-208. Rules.
The Arkansas Racing Commission may promulgate rules to administer and
enforce this subchapter.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that unlicensed, unregulated, and
untaxed casino style and sports wagering offerings are an ever-growing threat
to the citizens of Arkansas. Further, institutions of higher education and
their affiliated nonprofit organizations are intertwined with economic
development, the education of student-athletes, commerce, and other
governmental interests that otherwise impact the State of Arkansas; that a
drawing game conducted through interactive gaming, in order to benefit a
name, image, or likeness organization, the net proceeds of which, after
incurred expenses, are equally divided between a name, image, or likeness
organization and the participant, can increase economic development,
education, and commerce in the State of Arkansas; and that this act is
immediately necessary to ensure that institutions of higher education and
their affiliated nonprofit organizations can financially support their
student-athletes and athletic programs, which will bolster economic
development, education, and commerce in the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for
the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become
effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

03/19/2025 3:25:05 PM CRH297